Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-604
Seller of single-family dwelling; duties; interior alterations requiring permit; owner; duties.

(1) The seller of a single-family dwelling that is offered for sale or transfer on or after January 1, 2017, and that has a fuel-fired heater or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage shall ensure that an operational carbon monoxide alarm is installed on each habitable floor of the dwelling or in a location specified in any building code adopted by the state or by the political subdivision in which the dwelling is located.

(2) If the owner of a single-family dwelling that has a fuel-fired heater or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage makes any interior alteration, repair, fuel-fired appliance replacement, or addition on or after January 1, 2017, where a permit is required, the owner shall ensure that an operational carbon monoxide alarm is installed on each habitable floor of the dwelling where the alteration, repair, replacement, or addition occurs or in a location specified in any building code adopted by the state or by the political subdivision in which the dwelling is located. This subsection applies only to interior alterations. This subsection does not apply to exterior alterations which require a building permit.

(3) No person shall remove batteries from, or in any way render inoperable, a carbon monoxide alarm except as part of a process to inspect, maintain, repair, or replace the alarm or replace the batteries in the alarm.

Laws 2015, LB34, § 4.
August 30, 2015